New York, session 2025-2026, A3845.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 3309-c to read as follows: 3 § 3309-c. Psilocybin assisted therapy pilot program. 1. For the 4 purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following 5 meanings: 6 (a) "Certified medical use" includes use of medical psilocybin for a 7 patient to treat or alleviate a patient's medical condition or symptoms 8 associated with the patient's medical condition. 9 (b) "Facilitator" shall mean a mental health counselor, psychoanalyst, 10 psychologist, physician, physician assistant, registered professional 11 nurse, clinical nurse specialist, nurse practitioner, occupational ther- 12 apist, occupational therapy assistant, licensed clinical social worker, 13 or an individual with evidence of prior experience and knowledge in the 14 field of psychedelic assisted therapy who has completed all requirements 15 of this section. 16 (c) "Medical psilocybin" shall mean psilocybin intended for a certi- 17 fied medical use, as determined by the department. 18 (d) "Pilot program" shall mean the psilocybin assisted therapy 19 pilot program established under this section. 20 (e) "Psilocybin" shall mean a naturally occurring psychedelic prodrug 21 compound produced by fungi, including but not limited to members of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05253-06-6 A. 3845--A 2 1 genus Psilocybe. Such term shall include psilocin, the substance into 2 which psilocybin is converted in the human body. 3 2. (a) The department shall establish a psilocybin assisted therapy 4 pilot program. Such pilot program shall provide patient participants, as 5 described in paragraph (b) of this subdivision, with the funding neces- 6 sary to receive psilocybin assisted therapy. Such pilot program shall be 7 terminated upon the approval of psilocybin for medical use by the feder- 8 al drug enforcement administration, or any successor agency. 9 (b) Participants in the pilot program shall include veterans, first 10 responders and retired first responders. 11 (c) The department shall scale the number of patient participants 12 based on the outcomes of the pilot program and changes to federal laws, 13 rules, regulations, and approvals. 14 (d) The department shall implement the pilot program in partnership 15 with the state university of New York's academic health centers which 16 may include, but shall not be limited to, upstate medical university, 17 downstate health sciences university, Stony Brook University and the 18 university at Buffalo's Jacobs school of medicine and biomedical 19 sciences. 20 (e) The pilot program shall comply with and follow all applicable 21 regulations and standards of the federal food and drug administration, 22 federal drug enforcement administration, and any relevant institutional 23 review boards including, but not limited to, clinical trial processes, 24 investigational new drug pathways, schedule I research license require- 25 ments, protocols for ethical oversight. 26 (f) The pilot program shall not duplicate any mandated eligibility 27 criteria, safety reporting, or protections for participant patients that 28 the federal food and drug administration, federal drug enforcement 29 administration, and any other relevant institutional review boards and 30 shall defer to such administrations and boards for such. 31 (g) The department shall promulgate any necessary rules and regu- 32 lations for the application and distribution of any funds pursuant to 33 this subdivision. Such rules and regulations shall support the pilot 34 program operating within federal regulations, standards, and programs 35 and shall not create any new state rules or regulations which are not 36 consistent with such federal regulations, standards, and programs. 37 3. A facilitator shall be an individual qualified under the federal 38 research protocol utilized by a participating state university of New 39 York academic health center. 40 4. (a) The department may provide for the analysis and evaluation of 41 the operation of this section. The department may enter into agreements 42 with one or more persons, not-for-profit corporations, universities or 43 other organizations, for the performance of an evaluation of the imple- 44 mentation and effectiveness of this section. 45 (b) The department may develop, seek any necessary federal approval 46 for, and carry out research programs relating to medical use of psilocy- 47 bin. Participation in any such research program shall be voluntary on 48 the part of facilitators, patients, and designated caregivers. 49 (c) No later than two years after the effective date of this section 50 and every two years thereafter, the department shall report to the 51 governor and the legislature on the medical use of psilocybin under this 52 section and make appropriate recommendations. 53 (d) Based on the findings of the report required under paragraph (c) 54 of this subdivision, the department, in consultation with participating 55 state university of New York academic health centers, may develop and 56 implement a state-funded psilocybin assisted therapy training program. A. 3845--A 3 1 Such program shall be informed by the outcomes, best practices, safety 2 data, and clinical standards observed during the pilot program. 3 5. The provisions of this section shall take precedence over any 4 conflicting provisions of this chapter and article one hundred thirty- 5 seven of the education law. 6 6. (a) Patients, practitioners and facilitators shall not be subject 7 to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or 8 privilege, including but not limited to civil penalty or disciplinary 9 action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or 10 bureau, solely for the certified medical use of psilocybin or for any 11 other action or conduct in accordance with this section. 12 (b) This subdivision shall not bar the enforcement of a policy prohib- 13 iting an employee from performing such employee's employment duties 14 while impaired by a controlled substance. This subdivision shall not 15 require any person or entity to do any act that would put the person or 16 entity in direct violation of federal law or cause it to lose a federal 17 contract or funding. 18 (c) The fact that a person is a patient and/or acting in accordance 19 with this section, shall not be a consideration in a proceeding pursuant 20 to applicable sections of the domestic relations law, the social 21 services law, and the family court act. 22 (d) A person currently under parole, probation or other state or local 23 supervision, or released on bail awaiting trial may not be punished or 24 otherwise penalized for conduct allowed under this section. 25 7. The department shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary 26 to implement the provisions of this section. 27 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 99-uu 28 to read as follows: 29 § 99-uu. Psilocybin assisted therapy pilot program fund. 1. There is 30 hereby established in the joint custody of the commissioner of health 31 and the comptroller, a special fund to be known as the "psilocybin 32 assisted therapy pilot program fund". 33 2. Such fund shall consist of all moneys appropriated, credited, or 34 transferred thereto from any other fund or source pursuant to law. 35 Nothing contained in this section shall prevent the state from receiving 36 grants, gifts, or bequests for the purposes of the fund, as defined in 37 this section, and depositing them into the fund according to law. 38 3. Monies of the fund shall be expended only for the purposes operat- 39 ing the psilocybin assisted therapy pilot program established under 40 section thirty-three hundred nine-c of the public health law. 41 4. Monies of the fund shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the 42 comptroller on vouchers approved and certified by the commissioner of 43 health. 44 § 3. The sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000), or so much thereof 45 as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated from any moneys in the state 46 treasury in the general fund to the credit of the state purposes account 47 not otherwise appropriated to the psilocybin assisted therapy pilot 48 program fund established under section 99-uu of the state finance law in 49 carrying out the provisions of this act. Such sum shall be payable on 50 the audit and warrant of the state comptroller on vouchers certified or 51 approved in the manner provided by law. 52 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.